Nevada, session 83, AB578.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of Forestry of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources the sum of $6,000,000 for
grants and operating expenses for conservation projects through the
Nevada Shared Stewardship Agreement.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of Forestry of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources the sum of $67,279 for the
replacement of computer and information technology equipment.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of Forestry of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources the sum of $2,048,082 for
deferred maintenance projects.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources the sum of $2,592,156 for the Forestry Conservation
Camps budget account for the replacement of vehicles.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources the sum of $932,918 for the Forestry Conservation
Camps budget account for deferred facilities maintenance projects.
Sec. 6. Any remaining balance of an appropriation made by
sections 1 to 5, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
fund from which it was appropriated on or before September 17,
2027.
Sec. 7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources for the Forestry Conservation Camps budget account for
the replacement of equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $111,690
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $111,690
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources for the Forestry Conservation Camps budget account for
the replacement of computer and information technology equipment
the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $19,270
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $13,972
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 9. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)